Colorado, session 2026A, HB1074.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-303.5, add (5)
as follows:
2-2-303.5. Time for convening regular sessions - procedure for
convening earlier - duration of regular sessions.
(5) UPON CONVENING FOR A REGULAR SESSION, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY SHALL MEET FOR NO LONGER THAN NINETY CONSECUTIVE
CALENDAR DAYS.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-2- HB26-1074